Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2729.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeals Sections 41-3026.07, 41-3026.08, 41-3026.09, 41-3026.12 and 41-3026.21, Arizona Revised Statutes, are repealed. Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 41-3030.19, 41-3030.22, 41-3030.23, 41-3030.27 and 41-3032.11, to read: START_STATUTE41-3030.19. Arizona state board of nursing; termination July 1, 2030 A. The Arizona state board of nursing terminates on July 1, 2030. B. Title 32, chapter 15 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2031. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE41-3030.22. Board of occupational therapy examiners; termination July 1, 2030 A. The board of occupational therapy examiners terminates on July 1, 2030. B. Title 32, chapter 34 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2031. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE41-3030.23. Arizona regulatory board of physician assistants; termination July 1, 2030 A. The Arizona regulatory board of physician assistants terminates on July 1, 2030. B. Title 32, chapter 25 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2031.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE41-3030.27. Department of economic security; termination July 1, 2030 A. The department of economic security terminates on July 1, 2030. B. Title 41, chapter 14 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2031. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE41-3032.11. Arizona state board of pharmacy; termination July 1, 2032 A. The Arizona state board of pharmacy terminates on July 1, 2032. B. Title 32, chapter 18 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2033. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the Arizona state board of nursing to promote the safe and professional practice of nursing and its related professions. Sec. 4. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the board of occupational therapy examiners to promote the safe and professional practice of occupational therapy. Sec. 5. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the Arizona regulatory board of physician assistants to promote the safe and professional practice of health care tasks performed by physician assistants. Sec. 6. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the department of economic security to provide social services, welfare programs, vocational rehabilitation and employment services and developmental disability programs. Sec. 7. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the Arizona state board of pharmacy to promote the safe and professional practice of pharmacy in this state. Sec. 8. Retroactivity Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply retroactively to from and after July 1, 2026. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.